Utah statutes.
53B-2a-103.   Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees --
Membership -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Oath -- Officers -- Quorum -- Committees
-- Compensation.
(1)  There is created the Utah College of Applied Technology Board of
Trustees, composed of the following members:
(a)  one member of the State Board of Education appointed by the chair of the
State Board of Education, to serve as a nonvoting member;
(b)  one member of the State Board of Regents appointed by the chair of the
State Board of Regents, to serve as a nonvoting member;
(c)  one member representing business and industry employers from the campus
board of directors of each applied technology college campus appointed by a
majority vote of the business and industry employer members of the campus
board;
(d)  one member representing business and industry employers from the Snow
College career and technical education advisory committee appointed by a
majority of the business and industry members of the advisory committee;
(e)  one member representing business and industry employers from the College
of Eastern Utah career and technical education advisory committee appointed by
a majority of the business and industry employer members of the advisory
committee;
(f)  one member representing business and industry employers from the Salt
Lake Community College School of Applied Technology Board of Directors
appointed by a majority of the business and industry employer members of the
board of directors;
(g)  one business or industry employer representative appointed by the
governor with the consent of the Senate from nominations submitted by the
speaker of the House of Representatives and president of the Senate;
(h)  one representative of union craft, trade, or apprenticeship programs that
prepare workers for employment in career and technical education fields,
appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate;
(i)  one representative of non-union craft, trade, or apprenticeship programs
that prepare workers for employment in career and technical education fields,
appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate;
(j)  the commissioner of higher education; and
(k)  the executive director of the Governor's Office of Economic Development
or the executive director's designee.
(2) (a)  In making appointments to the board of trustees, the governor shall
consider:
(i)  individuals from the state at large with due consideration for
geographical representation;
(ii)  individuals recognized for their knowledge and expertise; and
(iii)  individuals who represent current and emerging business and industry
sectors of the state.
(b)  Appointments to the board shall be made on a nonpartisan basis.
(3) (a)  Except as provided under Subsection (3)(b), members of the board of
trustees shall be appointed commencing on July 1 of each odd-numbered year to
a four-year term.
(b)  Initial terms of the board members beginning on July 1, 2009 shall be
staggered with two-year and four-year terms so that approximately one-half of
the members' terms will expire in any odd-numbered year.
(c)  An appointed member holds office until a successor is appointed and
qualified.
(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(5) (a)  Each member shall take the official oath of office prior to assuming
the office.
(b)  The oath shall be filed with the Division of Archives and Records
Services.
(6)  The board of trustees shall elect a chair and vice chair, who serve for
two years and until their successors are elected and qualified.
(7) (a)  The board of trustees may enact bylaws for its own government,
including provision for regular meetings.
(b) (i)  The board of trustees may provide for an executive committee in its
bylaws.
(ii)  If established, the committee shall have full authority of the board of
trustees to act upon routine matters during the interim between board of
trustees meetings.
(iii)  The committee may act on nonroutine matters only under extraordinary
and emergency circumstances.
(iv)  The committee shall report its activities to the board of trustees at
its next regular meeting following the action.
(8)  A quorum shall be required to conduct business which shall consist of a
majority of voting board of trustee members.
(9)  The board of trustees may establish advisory committees.
(10) (a) (i)  Members who are not government employees shall receive no
compensation or benefits for their services, but may receive per diem and
expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties at the
rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(b) (i)  State government officer and employee members who do not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive
per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties
from the board of trustees at the rates established by the Division of Finance
under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  State government officer and employee members may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for their service.
(c) (i)  Higher education members who do not receive salary, per diem, or
expenses from the entity that they represent for their service may receive per
diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties from
the board of trustees at the rates established by the Division of Finance
under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  Higher education members may decline to receive per diem and expenses
for their service.
